Maine, session 132, LD1256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6664, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 457, §1, is
amended to read:
B. Improve food safety in school kitchens and cafeterias; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6664, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 457, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Support the maintenance and expansion of the National School Lunch Program and
the School Breakfast Program within the school administrative unit; and.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §6664, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 457, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §6006-F, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt.
ZZZZ, §1, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The following repair and renovation needs receive Priority 1 status:
(a) Repair or replacement of a roof on a school building;
(b) Bringing a school building into compliance with the federal Americans
with Disabilities Act, 42 United States Code, Section 12101 et seq. of 1990;
(c) Improving air quality in a school building;
(d) Removing or abating hazardous materials in a school building, including,
but not limited to, water lead abatement or mitigation pursuant to Title 22,
section 2604‑B; and
(f) Undertaking other health, safety and compliance repairs, including
installations or improvements necessary to increase school facility security.;
and
(g) Renovating school kitchens and cafeterias and replacing or adding kitchen
equipment to facilitate the serving of meals to students.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School Meal Equipment and Program Improvement Fund Z386
Initiative: Provides base allocations to authorize expenditures in the event funds are
received from federal grants.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
3362 School Meal Equipment and Program Improvement Fund Z386
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for grants to eligible school administrative units to
purchase school kitchen and cafeteria equipment, improve food safety in school kitchens
Page 1 - 132LR0751(01)

319 and cafeterias and support the maintenance and expansion of the National School Lunch
420 Program and the federal School Breakfast Program within the school administrative units.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $0

EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $500,000 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $500 $500
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $500,500 $500